fi: Ylikellotusprofiilin tuki: AMD EXPO; Sekä XMP että EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Ei mitään; Muu
ru: Поддержка профилей разгона: AMD EXPO; XMP и EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Нет; Другой
bg-BG: Поддръжка на профил за увеличаване на работната честота на процесора: AMD EXPO; И XMP, и EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Няма; Други
hr-HR: Podrška za profile overclockinga: AMD EXPO; Oba XMP i EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Nema; Ostalo
it: Supporto profilo overclock: AMD EXPO; Sia XMP che EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Nessuna; Altro
lt-LT: Spartinimo profilių palaikymas (XMP/EXPO): AMD EXPO; Tiek XMP, tiek EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Nėra; Kita
pt-PT: Suporte a perfil de overclock: AMD EXPO; Ambos XMP e EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Nenhum; Outro
fr: Prise en charge des profils d’overclocking: AMD EXPO; XMP et EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Aucune; Autre
th: การรองรับโปรไฟล์โอเวอร์คล็อก: AMD EXPO; ทั้ง XMP และ EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
de: Übertaktungsprofil-Unterstützung: AMD EXPO; Sowohl XMP als auch EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Keine; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 超频配置文件支持: AMD EXPO; XMP和EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; 无; 其他
pl: Obsługa profili podkręcania: AMD EXPO; Zarówno XMP jak i EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Brak; Inne
cs: Podpora profilů přetaktování: AMD EXPO; XMP i EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Žádný; Jiné
pt-BR: Suporte a perfil de overclock: AMD EXPO; Ambos XMP e EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Nenhum; Outro
en: Overclock profile support: AMD EXPO; Both XMP & EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; None; Other
da: Understøttelse af overclockingprofil: AMD EXPO; Både XMP & EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Ingen; Andet
sl-SI: Podpora za profile pretaktiranja: AMD EXPO; Tako XMP kot EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Brez; Drugo
es: Soporte de perfiles de overclocking: AMD EXPO; Ambos XMP y EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Ninguno; Otros
ja: オーバークロックプロファイルサポート: AMD EXPO; XMPとEXPO両方; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; なし; その他
tr: Hız aşırtma profili desteği: AMD EXPO; Hem XMP hem EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Hiçbiri; Diğer
sk-SK: Podpora profilov pretaktovania: AMD EXPO; XMP aj EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Žiadny; Iné
sv: Stöd för överklockningsprofil: AMD EXPO; Både XMP och EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Inga; Övrigt
zh-TW: 超頻設定檔支援: AMD EXPO; XMP 與 EXPO 雙支援; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; 無; 其他
vi: Hỗ trợ cấu hình ép xung: Amd expo; Cả xmp và expo; Intel xmp 2,0; Intel xmp 3,0; Không có; Khác
hu: Túlhajtási profil támogatása: AMD EXPO; XMP és EXPO egyaránt; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Egyik sem; Egyéb
nl: Ondersteuning voor overklokprofielen: AMD EXPO; Zowel XMP als EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Geen; Andere
nb: Støtte for overklokk-profiler: AMD EXPO; Både XMP og EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Ingen; Annet
el: Υποστήριξη προφίλ υπερχρονισμού: AMD EXPO; Και XMP και EXPO; Intel XMP 2.0; Intel XMP 3.0; Καμία; Άλλο
ro-RO: Suport profiluri de overclock: AMD EXPO; Ambele XMP și EXPO; Intel XMP 2,0; Intel XMP 3,0; Niciuna; Altele
ko: 오버클록 프로필 지원: AMD EXPO; XMP & EXPO 모두; 인텔 XMP 2.0; 인텔 XMP 3.0; 없음; 기타